Illinois, session 104th, HB4325.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 122-9 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/122-9)7    Sec. 122-9. Motion to resentence by the People.8    (a) The purpose of sentencing is to advance public safety 9through punishment, rehabilitation, and restorative justice. 10By providing a means to reevaluate a sentence after some time 11has passed, the General Assembly intends to provide the 12State's Attorney and the court with another tool to ensure 13that these purposes are achieved.14    (b) An eligible offender, as defined in subsection (b-5), 15or an eligible offender's attorney or an attorney associate of 16the attorney At any time upon the recommendation of the 17State's Attorney of the county in which the defendant was 18sentenced, the State's Attorney may petition the sentencing 19court or the sentencing court's successor to resentence the 20offender if the original sentence no longer advances the 21interests of justice. The sentencing court or the sentencing 22court's successor may resentence the offender if it finds that 23the original sentence no longer advances the interests of   HB4325- 2 -LRB104 16983 RLC 30397 b1justice.2    (b-5) "Eligible offender" means a defendant who meets the 3following requirements to petition the sentencing court. The 4eligible offender:5        (1) must have been originally sentenced to 10 or more 6    years in the Department of Corrections by a circuit court 7    of this State;8        (2) must have been convicted for a crime that is not a 9    violent crime for which the offender is seeking 10    resentencing. In this paragraph (2), "violent crime" has 11    the meaning provided in subsection (c) of Section 3 of the 12    Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act;13        (3) must have participated in educational programs, 14    drug programs, or received earned credit through work 15    programs;16        (4) must have served a minimum of 24 months in the 17    Department of Corrections for the conviction in which the 18    offender is seeking resentencing;19        (5) must not have violated serious rules or 20    disciplinary standards within the Department of 21    Corrections in the last 24 months prior to the filing of 22    the petition; and23        (6) must have remained in the least restrictive 24    privilege level for privileges within the Department of 25    Corrections for incarcerated persons, one year prior to 26    the petition.   HB4325- 3 -LRB104 16983 RLC 30397 b1    (c) Upon the receipt of a petition for resentencing, the 2court may resentence the defendant in the same manner as if the 3offender had not previously been sentenced; however, the new 4sentence, if any, may not be greater than the initial 5sentence. The court has 6 months from when a petition was filed 6to respond to the petition. 7    (d) The court may consider postconviction factors, 8including, but not limited to, the inmate's disciplinary 9record and record of rehabilitation while incarcerated; 10evidence that reflects whether age, time served, and 11diminished physical condition, if any, have reduced the 12inmate's risk for future violence; and evidence that reflects 13changed circumstances since the inmate's original sentencing 14such that the inmate's continued incarceration no longer 15serves the interests of justice. Credit shall be given for 16time served.17    (e) Victims shall be afforded all rights as outlined in 18the Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act.19    (f) A resentencing under this Section shall not reopen the 20defendant's conviction to challenges that would otherwise be 21barred.22    (g) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit 23the power of the Governor under the Constitution to grant a 24reprieve, commutation of sentence, or pardon. 25(Source: P.A. 102-102, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)